New York, session 2025-2026, A1016.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. A chapter of the laws of 2024 directing the commissioner of 2 health and the commissioner of the office for people with developmental 3 disabilities to conduct a study of the delivery of services to individ- 4 uals with traumatic brain injury, as proposed in legislative bills 5 numbers S. 1478 and A. 7215, is REPEALED. 6 § 2. Subdivision 2 of section 2744 of the public health law, as added 7 by chapter 196 of the laws of 1994, is amended to read as follows: 8 2. (a) The council shall be charged with recommending to the depart- 9 ment long range objectives, goals and priorities. It shall also provide 10 advice on the planning, coordination and development of needed services. 11 In making such recommendations, the council shall consider: 12 (i) the availability and accessibility of services for individuals 13 diagnosed with traumatic brain injury, the cost of receiving such 14 services, and any disparities that may exist in the regional availabili- 15 ty of services; 16 (ii) emerging trends in traumatic brain injury, including changes in 17 incidences, changes in the needs of individuals with traumatic brain 18 injury, and assess the training service providers receive relating to 19 traumatic brain injury; EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02802-01-5 A. 1016 2 1 (iii) the difference in services availability and outcomes for indi- 2 viduals that may be enrolled in any Medicaid waiver; and 3 (iv) the efficiency of the administrative processes that provide indi- 4 viduals with traumatic brain injury official approvals or denials of 5 service. 6 (b) The council shall post the recommendations developed pursuant to 7 paragraph (a) of this subdivision on the department's website on or 8 before one year from the date this paragraph shall take effect and annu- 9 ally thereafter. 10 § 3. This act shall take effect on the same date and in the same 11 manner as a chapter of the laws of 2024 directing the commissioner of 12 health and the commissioner of the office for people with developmental 13 disabilities to conduct a study of the delivery of services to individ- 14 uals with traumatic brain injury, as proposed in legislative bills 15 numbers S. 1478 and A. 7215, takes effect.